Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11010.1 of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Transparency
and Accountability Platform (TAP) Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11010.2 of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:

Req. No. 16443 Page 2

1. "Cryptographic assertion" means a nonbiometric,
cryptographically secured message from a device indicating the
result of an on-device biometric check such as success or failure
without transmitting biometric data;
2. "Decentralized, on-device biometric authentication" means
biometric recognition performed entirely on a user's device, wherein
biometric identifiers and templates never leave the device and are
never stored or shared with the Department of Human Services
(Department), the State Department of Corrections (DOC), the
Transparency and Accountability Platform (TAP) provider, or any
third party;
3. "Event" means a defined interaction relevant to program
integrity or supervision, including but not limited to:
a. for the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
(SNAP): enrollment, recertification, account
creation, device registration, or other high-risk
transactions, and
b. for the Department of Corrections: supervision of
check-ins, curfew verifications, program or treatment
attendance, and other required contacts;
4. "Participant" means an applicant for, or recipient of, SNAP
or related Department of Human Services-administered benefits;
5. "Supervised individual" means a person under the authority
or supervision of the Department of Corrections, including, but not
Req. No. 16443 Page 3

limi ted to, parole, probation, community supervision, or similar
status;
6. "Thin overlay" means a technology layer that interfaces with
existing eligibility, case management, supervision, and payment
systems without replacing those core systems; and
7. "Transparency and Accountability Platform" or "TAP platform"
means a digital platform, implemented as a thin overlay to existing
systems, which provides, at a minimum:
a. decentralized, on-device biometric authentication,
b. geolocation or geofence-based verification of events,
c. cryptographic timestamping of events, and
d. an automated policy rules engine or logic layer to
evaluate events for fraud, noncompliance, or anomalies
in real time.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11010.3 of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Transparency and Accountability Platform (TAP platform)
is hereby established as a statewide technology framework to
support:
1. A Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) Integrity
Overlay administered by the Department of Human Services
(Department); and

Req. No. 16443 Page 4

2. A Corrections Transparency Overlay administered by the State
Department of Corrections (DOC).
B. The Department and DOC are authorized to procure, deploy,
operate, and require the use of the TAP platform within their
respective program areas, in coordination with the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services and subject to state procurement
laws.
C. The TAP platform shall be designed and implemented as a thin
overlay, interoperable with existing state systems, and shall not
require replacement of existing core eligibility, supervision, or
payment systems.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11010.4 of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Human Services (Department) shall
implement the TAP platform as a Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program (SNAP) Integrity Overlay for the following purposes:
1. To verify the identity of participants during enrollment,
recertification, and device registration through decentralized, on-
device biometrics;
2. To associate defined events with geolocation and
cryptographic timestamps to the extent permitted by federal SNAP law
and guidance;

Req. No. 16443 Page 5

3. To support detection and deterrence of identity-based fraud,
skimming, cloning, and stolen benefit misuse; and
4. To provide dashboards, audit logs, and analytics for
oversight, reporting, and fraud investigation.
B. The Department shall implement an initial pilot program
using the TAP platform:
1. Pilot launch shall occur within six (6) months of receipt of
funding appropriated for this purpose;
2. The pilot shall run for a duration of not less than six (6)
months and not more than twelve (12) months;
3. The pilot may be limited to designated geographic areas or
participant populations; and
4. The Department shall submit quarterly reports to the
Legislature during the pilot period, including fraud metrics, access
issues, and administrative impacts.
C. After completion of the pilot and review of the reports
required by this act, the Department is authorized to expand the
SNAP Integrity Overlay statewide, subject to any additional
conditions or modifications enacted by the Legislature.
D. Participation in TAP-enabled platform processes shall be
administered in a manner consistent with federal SNAP eligibility,
cooperation, and nondiscrimination requirements, and no participant
shall be denied or terminated from SNAP solely due to technical
failure of the TAP platform.
Req. No. 16443 Page 6

SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11010.5 of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Department of Corrections (DOC) shall implement
the TAP platform as a Corrections Transparency Overlay for the
following purposes:
1. To verify the identity of supervised individuals at
enrollment and during required check-ins, curfew verifications, and
program attendance through decentralized, on-device biometrics;
2. To associate such supervision events with geofenced location
data and cryptographic timestamps;
3. To provide officers, supervisors, courts, and boards with
dashboards and immutable audit logs of compliance and violations;
and
4. To support automated alerts when events are missed, late, or
out of authorized locations, pursuant to DOC rules.
B. The DOC shall implement an initial pilot program using the
TAP platform:
1. The pilot program shall commence within three (3) months to
six (6) months of receipt of funding appropriated for this purpose;
2. The pilot program shall run for a duration of approximately
twelve (12) months;
3. The pilot program may be limited to selected supervision
populations or regions; and
Req. No. 16443 Page 7

4. The DOC shall submit quarterly reports to the Legislature
during the pilot period, including compliance outcomes, officer
workload impacts, and system performance.
C. After completion of the pilot program and review of the
reports required by this act, the DOC is authorized to expand the
Corrections Transparency Overlay statewide, subject to any
additional conditions or modifications enacted by the Legislature.
D. Use of the TAP platform for supervision shall be limited to
purposes reasonably related to conditions of supervision and public
safety, and technical failures shall be considered in evaluating
alleged violations.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11010.6 of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. 1. Biometric identifiers and templates used for
authentication under this act shall remain on the participant's or
supervised individual's device (or a designated secure device) and
shall not be transmitted to, stored by, or shared with the
Department of Human Services (Department), the State Department of
Corrections (DOC), the TAP platform provider, or any third party.
2. The TAP platform may receive only nonbiometric cryptographic
assertions indicating whether on-device biometric authentication
succeeded or failed. Such assertions shall not contain biometric

Req. No. 16443 Page 8

data and shall not be usable to reconstruct any biometric
identifier.
B. 1. The Department and DOC may receive and maintain non-
biometric data, including event identifiers, device identifiers,
geolocation data, timestamps, and compliance status derived from
policy logic; and
2. Access to such data shall be restricted to authorized
personnel, governed by written policies, and recorded in tamper-
evident audit logs.
C. 1. For the Department, data from the TAP platform shall be
used only for administration, integrity, and oversight of the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) and directly
related human-services programs;
2. For the DOC, data from the TAP platform shall be used only
for administration and oversight of supervision and related
correctional purposes; and
3. Data collected under this act shall not be used for
unrelated general surveillance or for commercial purposes.
D. 1. The Department shall retain nonbiometric TAP platform
data only as necessary to comply with federal SNAP requirements,
state records laws, and applicable privacy protections;
2. The DOC shall retain nonbiometric TAP platform data only as
necessary to comply with DOC policy, criminal justice information
system requirements, and state records laws; and
Req. No. 16443 Page 9

3. All nonbiometric data shall be protected by encryption in
transit and at rest and by tamper-evident logging of access and
changes.
E. The Department and DOC shall provide clear, plain language
notices to participants and supervised individuals describing the
use of the TAP platform, what data is collected, how it is used, how
long it is retained, and how records may be challenged.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11010.7 of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Human Services (Department) is authorized
to promulgate rules for the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program (SNAP) Integrity Overlay, including, but not limited to:
1. Enrollment and device registration procedures;
2. Use of TAP platform assertions in eligibility and fraud
investigations;
3. Appeals and identity-challenge processes;
4. Reporting, timelines, and data retention policies; and
5. Alternative procedures for individuals unable to use TAP
platform technology.
B. The State Department of Corrections (DOC) is authorized to
promulgate rules for the Corrections Transparency Overlay,
including, but not limited to:
1. Enrollment and device assignment procedures;
Req. No. 16443 Page 10

2. Use of TAP platform data in supervision decisions and
violation reports;
3. Appeals, dispute, and correction processes;
4. Data retention and access policies consistent with Criminal
Justice Information Systems and other standards; and
5. Officer training and use of dashboards and alerts.
C. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services may adopt
technical and security standards to ensure interoperability,
cybersecurity, and consistent implementation of the TAP platform
across agencies.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11010.8 of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. During each pilot phase, the Department of Human Services
(Department) and the State Department of Corrections (DOC) shall
submit quarterly written reports to the President Pro Tempore of the
Oklahoma State Senate, the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives, and relevant oversight committees.
B. Reports from the Department shall include, at a minimum:
1. Estimates of reductions in fraud and improper payments;
2. Impacts on processing times and administrative workload;
3. Access and usability issues, including impacts on older
adults and rural participants; and
4. Recommendations for statewide expansion or modification.
Req. No. 16443 Page 11

C. Reports from the DOC shall include, at a minimum:
1. Compliance rates and changes in violations or absconding
incidents;
2. Impacts on officer workload and supervision efficiency;
3. System performance and failure incidents; and
4. Recommendations for statewide expansion or modification.
D. Reports shall be made available to the public, with
personally identifiable information removed or redacted in
accordance with state and federal law.
SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11010.9 of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The TAP platform shall, to the extent practicable, be
interoperable with:
1. The Department of Human Services' (Department) eligibility
and case management systems and electronic benefit transfer (EBT)
processors;
2. The State Department of Corrections' (DOC) case management
and supervision systems, as well as court and parole board
information systems;
3. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services' (OMES)
identity and security services; and
4. Applicable federal systems and standards.

Req. No. 16443 Page 12

B. The state shall retain ownership of its data and
configurations created under contracts implementing the TAP
platform, and vendors shall retain intellectual property rights in
their pre-existing and general purpose technologies, subject to
license terms negotiated in procurement.
SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11010.10 of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Human Services (Department) and the State
Department of Corrections (DOC) shall each be responsible for
oversight of their respective implementations of the TAP platform
and for mitigating the effects of system failures.
B. No participant or supervised individual shall be sanctioned,
denied benefits, or found in violation solely because of a technical
failure of the TAP platform, including outages, connectivity issues,
or erroneous system outputs, without appropriate review and
remediation.
C. System failures that materially affect program integrity or
supervision outcomes shall be documented and reported in the
periodic reports required by Section 8 of this act.
SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Department of Human Services to be designated
Req. No. 16443 Page 13

the "Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program Integrity Overlay
Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received
by the Department of Human Services from monies appropriated by the
Legislature, federal funds, grants, and other lawful funding
sources. All monies accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Department of
Human Services for the purpose of planning, developing, piloting,
and deploying the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP)
Integrity Overlay and shall include:
1. Due diligence and federal compliance analysis;
2. Integration mapping and application development;
3. Backend system configuration and deployment;
4. Training, dashboards, and oversight tools; and
5. Pilot implementation and evaluation.
Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by
the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Department of Corrections to be designated the
"Corrections Transparency Overlay Revolving Fund". The fund shall
be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and
shall consist of all monies received by the State Department of
Req. No. 16443 Page 14

Corr ections from monies appropriated by the Legislature, federal
funds, grants, and other lawful funding sources. All monies
accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and may
be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma Department of Corrections
for the purpose of planning, developing, piloting, and deploying the
Corrections Transparency Overlay and shall include:
1. Requirements gathering and policy design;
2. Pilot deployment, including hardware and software;
3. Officer dashboards and mobile interfaces; and
4. Reporting and analytics tools.
Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by
the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 12. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16443 TJ 02/17/26







Req. No. 16443 Page 15